Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB22.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 50 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding parts to read:PART IPRELIMINARY PROVISIONS(Reserved)PART IIMINORSChapter10. Preliminary Provisions (Reserved)11. Protecting Minors on Social MediaCHAPTER 10PRELIMINARY PROVISIONS(Reserved)123456789101112131415161718 CHAPTER 11PROTECTING MINORS ON SOCIAL MEDIASubchapterA. General ProvisionsB. Unlawful Activity C. Consent to Open an AccountD. DataSUBCHAPTER AGENERAL PROVISIONSSec.1101. Scope of chapter.1102. Legislative intent.1103. Definitions.§ 1101. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to protecting minors on social media.§ 1102. Legislative intent.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Social media use among American teenagers is nearly universal. According to the Pew Research Center, 95% of teens report using YouTube and 67% of teens have used TikTok, with 16% using TikTok almost constantly.(2) According to the Pew Research Center, 54% of teens say it would be difficult to give up social media entirely.(3) Social media use is linked to negative feelings among teens. A growing body of research, described in the International Journal of Adolescence and Youth and elsewhere, has found that increased social media use is associated with greater rates of depression and anxiety in teens. Additional research published in the Children and Youth Services Review describe a trend in which social media use can trigger and 20250SB0022PN0120 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accelerate offline violence.(4) Rates of suicide and self-harm among American teenagers have grown dramatically in recent years. The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention have found that, in 2021, three in five girls felt persistently sad and hopeless, while more than one in four girls reported seriously considering attempting suicide. These rates have increased significantly since 2011.(5) Federal and state policymakers are beginning to recognize the risks that social media use places on American youth. A number of recent policy proposals provide parents and guardians of teenagers with greater oversight over their children's social media use.(6) In May 2023, the United States Surgeon General released a health advisory finding that "more research is needed to fully understand the impact of social media; however, the current body of evidence indicates that while social media may have benefits for some children and adolescents, there are ample indicators that social media can also have a profound risk of harm to the mental health and well-being of children and adolescents." The advisory recommends a range of policies to consider, including "policies that further limit access - in ways that minimize the risk of harm - to social media for all children, including strengthening and enforcing age minimums."(7) In addition to empowering parents and guardians to protect children against these risks, policymakers are establishing mechanisms to hold social media companies accountable for harms to children and youth.(8) Greater oversight of social media platforms will 20250SB0022PN0120 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 enable families in this Commonwealth to use online tools in a more productive and healthy fashion.§ 1103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Account." Any means of registration by which an individual may engage in one or more functions of a social media platform."Delete." To remove personal information so the information is not retrievable by anyone and cannot be retrieved in the normal course of business."Fund." The School Safety and Security Fund established under section 1306-B(h) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949."Mine." The activity or process of searching through large amounts of information for specific data or patterns."Minor." Except as provided in section 1131 (relating to definitions), an individual who is less than 16 years of age."Personal information." As defined in 15 U.S.C. § 6501 (relating to definitions)."Personalized recommendation system." A fully or partially automated system that is based on a user's historical activity data and which suggests, promotes or ranks information that is presented or displayed to users."School entity." A school district, intermediate unit, area career and technical school, charter school or private residential rehabilitative institution."Social media company." A person that owns or operates one or more social media platforms."Social media platform." A public or semipublic Internet-20250SB0022PN0120 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 based service or application that has users in this Commonwealth and that meets all of the following criteria:(1) A primary function of the service or application is to connect users in order to allow users to interact socially with each other within the service or application, provided that a service or application that provides email or direct messaging services, commercial transactions or cloud computing shall not be considered to meet this criterion solely on the basis of that function.(2) The service or application allows users to do all of the following:(i) Construct a public or semipublic profile for purposes of signing into and using the service or application.(ii) Populate a list of other users with whom an individual shares a social connection within the system.(iii) Create or post content viewable by other users, including on message boards, in chat rooms or through a landing page or main feed that presents the user with content generated by other users.SUBCHAPTER BUNLAWFUL ACTIVITYSec.1110. Unlawful activity.§ 1110. Unlawful activity.(a) Unlawful activity.--It shall be unlawful for a social media company or a social media platform to intentionally, knowingly, recklessly or negligently cause or encourage a minor to access content which the social media company knows or should have known subjects one or more minors to harm that is 20250SB0022PN0120 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 detrimental to the physical health, mental health or the well-being of a minor or that creates a reasonable likelihood of bodily injury or death to the minor.(b) Exclusive jurisdiction.--The Attorney General shall have exclusive jurisdiction for violations of this section.(c) Damages.--A court of competent jurisdiction may award damages as provided under this subsection. In determining the extent of injury, the court shall consider the damage caused to the minor due to utilization of a social media platform by the minor. The court may award:(1) Actual costs incurred as a result of the damage, including costs associated with counseling services, doctor's visits, treatment and copays.(2) Actual attorney fees and court costs incurred by the Attorney General.(3) Punitive damages determined by the court.(4) Consequential damages, if harm to reputation occurred, as determined by the court.(d) Deposit.--Damages recovered under subsection (c)(3) and (4) shall be deposited into the fund to be used exclusively for mental health-related services for students.(e) Remedies preserved.--Nothing under this section shall be construed to limit the Attorney General's ability to bring an action under other provisions of law.(f) Good faith.--It shall be a defense to an action under subsection (a) if a social media company takes good faith actions, as determined by a court of competent jurisdiction, to protect a minor from content that the social media company knew or should have known subjects a minor to harm and is detrimental to the physical health, mental health or the well-being of a 20250SB0022PN0120 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 minor or that creates a reasonable likelihood of bodily injury or death to the minor resulting from the use of the social media company's platform.SUBCHAPTER CCONSENT TO OPEN AN ACCOUNTSec.1121. Applicability.1122. Age assurance . 1123. Duties.1124. Revocation of consent.1125. Violations.§ 1121. Applicability.This subchapter shall apply to accounts opened on or after the effective date of this section.§ 1122. Age assurance.Utilizing commercially available best practices, a social media platform shall make commercially reasonable efforts to verify the age of users upon the creation of an account, with a level of certainty appropriate to the risks that arise from the information management practices of the social media company, or apply the accommodations afforded to minors under this chapter to all account holders.§ 1123. Duties.(a) Consent required.--Except as provided under subsection (a.1), a social media company may not permit a minor residing in this Commonwealth to become an account holder on a social media platform unless the minor has the express consent of the minor's parent or legal guardian. A social media platform may obtain express consent from a minor's parent or legal guardian through any of the following means:20250SB0022PN0120 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) By providing a completed form, developed by the Attorney General, from a minor's parent or legal guardian to sign and return to the social media platform via mail or electronic means.(2) Through a toll-free telephone number for a minor's parent or legal guardian to call.(3) Through a call with a minor's parent or legal guardian over video conferencing technology.(4) By collecting information related to the government-issued identification of a minor's parent or legal guardian, shared by the parent or legal guardian. A social media platform shall delete the information related to the government-issued identification of a minor's parent or legal guardian after confirming the identity of a minor's parent or legal guardian.(5) Allowing a minor's parent or legal guardian to provide consent by responding to an email and taking additional steps to verify the identity of a minor's parent or legal guardian.(6) Any other commercially reasonable methods of obtaining consent in light of available technology.(a.1) Exception.-- A social media company that does not have reason to believe a user is a minor through the use of commercially reasonable practices, or that has used commercially reasonable practices to verify that a user is not a minor, is not required to obtain express consent under this section.(b) Attorney General.--The Office of Attorney General shall develop and make available on its publicly accessible Internet website a form that may be used by a parent or legal guardian to provide consent for a minor to open a social media account. The 20250SB0022PN0120 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Attorney General shall transmit a copy of the form to each social media company.(c) Documentation.--A social media platform shall maintain documentation as to the manner in which the social media company has obtained express consent from a minor's parent or legal guardian. The social media platform may delete the documentation when the minor is no longer a minor or within the established time frame by the social media company for maintaining data, whichever is later.(d) Social media company.--Each social media company shall post in a conspicuous place on each of their social media platforms notice that express consent by the minor's parent or legal guardian shall be required prior to opening an account. Any electronic consent included in a social media platform must include the same information as required by the form developed by the Attorney General's office under subsection (b).(e) Failure to obtain consent.--To the extent possible, if a minor opens a social media account without express consent by the minor's parent or legal guardian, the social media company shall, within a reasonable time after discovery of the failure to obtain the express consent:(1) suspend the social media account; and(2) notify the minor's parent or legal guardian that the minor has attempted to open a social media account without their consent.(f) Social media access.--To the extent possible, a social media company shall provide a minor's parent or legal guardian who has given express consent for the minor to become an account holder with a means for the minor's parent or legal guardian to initiate account supervision. Account supervision may include:20250SB0022PN0120 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) allowing the minor's parent or legal guardian the ability to view privacy settings of the minor's account;(2) allowing a minor's parent or legal guardian to set daily time limits for the minor's account;(3) allowing a minor's parent or legal guardian to schedule breaks for the minor's account; and(4) allowing a minor the option of providing notifications to the minor's parent or legal guardian if the minor reports a person or an issue to the social media platform.(g) Notification.--A social media platform shall provide clear notice to the minor on the features of the minor's account to which the minor's parent or legal guardian may have access.(h) No account required.--A social media platform may not require a parent or legal guardian to have their own account as a condition of a minor being able to open an account.(i) Notice of alleged violation.--A social media company shall develop and post notice on its publicly accessible Internet website of the methods, including electronic and telephonic means, by which a minor's parent or legal guardian may notify the social media company that the minor has opened a social media account on its social media platform without the required consent.§ 1124. Revocation of consent.(a) Time.-- A minor's parent or legal guardian who has provided express consent under this subchapter may revoke the consent at any time.(b) Social media platform .--A social media platform shall take reasonable steps to provide a parent or legal guardian who has provided express consent for a minor to open a social media 20250SB0022PN0120 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 account with the ability to revoke the consent.(c) Effect of revocation.--A social media platform that receives a revocation of consent under subsection (a) shall, to the extent possible, within a reasonable time frame from receipt of the revocation, suspend, delete or disable the account of the minor for whom consent was revoked.§ 1125. Violations.(a) Action.--The Attorney General shall have jurisdiction to bring an action against a social media company that knowingly, intentionally or negligently allows for a minor to open a social media account without express consent of the minor's parent or legal guardian. The Attorney General may bring multiple cases at one time against a social media company for violations of this chapter.(b) Penalty.--(1) For a first offense for an action brought on behalf of a single minor, a civil penalty not to exceed $2,500.(2) For a second offense for an action brought on behalf of the same single minor under paragraph (1), a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000.(3) For a third or subsequent offense for an action brought on behalf of the same single minor under paragraph (1), a civil penalty not to exceed $50,000.(4) For a first offense for an action brought on behalf of multiple minors, a civil penalty not to exceed the greater of $5,000,000 or the total number of violations multiplied by the maximum civil penalty under paragraph (1).(5) If a court of competent jurisdiction determines that there have been repeated intentional violations of this chapter by a social media company, the court may enter an 20250SB0022PN0120 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 order enjoining the social media company from operating accounts for minors in this Commonwealth. (c) Use of recovered fees.--Civil fees collected under subsection (b) shall be deposited into the fund to be used exclusively for mental health-related services for school entities.(d) Good faith.--It shall be a defense to an action under subsection (a) if a social media company allows for the creation or opening of an account for a minor based on a good faith belief that the minor has obtained the express consent required under this subchapter.SUBCHAPTER DDATASec.1131. Definitions.1132. Prohibitions.1133. Violations.1134. Removal.§ 1131. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Minor." An individual who is under 18 years of age."Qualified individual." Any of the following:(1) A parent or guardian of a minor.(2) An adult individual from whom data was collected when the individual was a minor."Sale," "sell" or "sold." The exchange of personal information for monetary consideration by the business to a third party. The term does not include:20250SB0022PN0120 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The disclosure of personal information to a processor that processes the personal information on behalf of the business.(2) The disclosure of personal information to a third party for purposes of providing a product or service requested by the consumer.(3) The disclosure or transfer of personal information to an affiliate of the business.(4) The disclosure of information that the consumer:(i) intentionally made available to the general public via a channel of mass media; and(ii) did not restrict to a specific audience.(5) The disclosure or transfer of personal information to a third party as an asset that is part of a merger, acquisition, bankruptcy or other transaction in which the third party assumes control of all or part of the business's assets."Targeted advertising." The displaying of advertisements to a consumer where the advertisement is selected based on personal information obtained from that consumer's activities over time and across nonaffiliated websites or online applications to predict the consumer's preferences or interests. The term does not include:(1) advertisements based on activities within a social media platform's own websites or online applications;(2) advertisements based on the context of a consumer's current search query, visit to a website or online application;(3) advertisements directed to a consumer in response to the consumer's request for information or feedback; or20250SB0022PN0120 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) processing personal information processed solely for measuring or reporting advertising performance, reach or frequency."Third party." An individual or legal entity, public authority, agency or body, other than the consumer, business or processor or an affiliate of the processor or the business.§ 1132. Prohibitions.(a) Mining.--A social media company may not mine data related to a minor who has opened a social media account, notwithstanding if the account was opened with the express consent of the minor's parent or legal guardian. This subsection shall not apply to any of the following:(1) Data regarding age and location for purposes of personalized recommendations related to age-appropriate content.(2) The mining of data necessary to protect minors from viewing harmful content.(3) Mining of data that is adequate, relevant and reasonably necessary in relation to the purpose for which the data is processed, as disclosed.(b) Sale of data.--A social media company may not sell personal information related to a minor who has opened a social media account, or engage in targeted advertising based on a minor's age, gender or interests, notwithstanding if the account was opened with the express consent of a minor's parent or legal guardian.(c) Personalized recommendations.--A social media platform may provide a prominent, accessible and responsive tool for a user who is a minor to opt in of the use of search and watch history for use in personalized recommendation systems. A social 20250SB0022PN0120 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 media platform may not use a personalized recommendation system unless a minor opts in.§ 1133. Violations.(a) Actions.--The Attorney General shall have jurisdiction to bring an action against a social media company that knowingly, intentionally or negligently violates a prohibition under section 1132 (relating to prohibitions).(b) Penalty.--(1) For a first offense for an action brought on behalf of a single minor, a civil penalty not to exceed $10,000.(2) For a second offense for an action brought on behalf of the same single minor under paragraph (1), a civil penalty not to exceed $50,000.(3) For a third or subsequent offense for an action brought on behalf of the same single minor under paragraph (1), a civil penalty not to exceed $500,000.(4) For a first offense for an action brought on behalf of multiple minors, a civil penalty not to exceed the greater of $50,000,000 or the total number of violations multiplied by the maximum civil penalty under paragraph (1).(5) For a violation of paragraphs (1), (2), (3) and (4), a court of competent jurisdiction may order data collected as a result of a violation of a prohibition under section 1132 to be deleted from the Internet. The cost of removal shall be paid by the social media company.(6) If a court of competent jurisdiction determines that there has been repeated intentional violations of a prohibition under section 1132 by a social media company, the court may prohibit the social media company from operating accounts for minors in this Commonwealth. 20250SB0022PN0120 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Use of recovered fees.--Civil fees collected under this section shall be deposited into the fund to be used for mental health-related services for school entities.(d) Good faith.--It shall be a defense to an action under subsection (a) if a social media company takes good faith actions to limit the personal information mined from a minor or acts in good faith to prohibit the sale of personal information of a minor.§ 1134. Removal.(a) Process.--In response to a request from a qualified individual, a social media platform shall provide the individual with the ability to correct or delete personal information that the qualified individual has provided to the social media platform or that the social media platform obtained about the qualified individual. De-identified information may be considered deleted for purposes of this subchapter.(b) Fulfilling requests.--To help fulfill requests from a qualified individual, a social media platform may:(1) require the qualified individual to reasonably identify the activities to which the qualified individual's request relates; and(2) provide automated tools that allow qualified individuals to correct or delete personal information under subsection (a).(c) Notice.--A social media platform that has mined or collected personal information from a minor or retains personal information about a minor shall prominently display notice on the website of how a qualified individual can request that the social media platform delete personal information in the possession of the social media platform that was collected from 20250SB0022PN0120 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or about the individual when the individual was a minor.(d) Deletion.--Upon a request of a qualified individual, a social media platform shall, no later than 30 days after the request, delete personal information in the possession of the social media company that was mined or collected from or about the individual when the individual was a minor.(e) Confirmation.--Within 90 business days of personal information being deleted by the social media company, the social media company shall provide, by written communication, notice to the qualified individual that personal information has been deleted.(f) Violations.--A social media company that fails to delete personal information when a request to delete personal information is made by a qualified individual shall be strictly liable for a civil penalty of $10,000 per day per website until the personal information has been deleted. If a social media company has received consent from a parent or guardian to collect personal information of a minor, the consent shall be an absolute defense to a violation of this section. The Attorney General shall have exclusive jurisdiction to bring an action under this section.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 18 months.20250SB0022PN0120 - 17 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122